Georgia statutes. TITLE 47 Retirement and Pensions
Article 1 General Provisions

47-11-1.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, the term:

“Adjusted annual income” means the maximum income determined by application of paragraph (5) of Code Section 47-11-40.

“Adjusted monthly income” means a sum equal to one-twelfth of the adjusted annual income.

“Board” means the Board of Commissioners of the Judges of the Probate Courts Retirement Fund of Georgia.

“Fund” means the Judges of the Probate Courts Retirement Fund of Georgia.

“Member” means a member of the Judges of the Probate Courts Retirement Fund of Georgia.

History.

Code 1981, §

47-11-1

; Ga. L. 2014, p. 179, § 1/HB 601.

The 2014 amendment,

effective July 1, 2014, added paragraphs (1) and (2); and redesignated former paragraphs (1) through (3) as present paragraphs (3) through (5), respectively.

Editor’s notes.

This Code section was created as part of the Code revision and was thus enacted by Ga. L. 1981, Ex. Sess., p. 8.